Louisiana, session 2026, HB1222.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 70 of Title 51 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 51:3301 through 3304, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 70. GROCERY INITIATIVE ACT
§3301. Short title
This Chapter may be known as and cited as the "Grocery Initiative Act".
§3302. Definitions
For the purposes of this Chapter, the following terms have the following
meanings ascribed to them:
(1) "Department" means Louisiana Economic Development.
(2)(a) "Food desert" means a census tract that is both of the following:
(i) Meets one of the following poverty standards:
Page 1 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1810 RE-REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1222
(aa) The census tract has a poverty rate of at least twenty percent.
(bb) The census tract is not located within a metropolitan statistical area and
has a median family income that is less than or equal to eighty percent of the
statewide median household income.
(cc) The census tract is located within a metropolitan statistical area and has
a median family income that is less than or equal to eighty percent of the greater of
the statewide median household income or the metropolitan area median family
income.
(ii) Meets one of the following population density and food accessibility
standards:
(aa) The census tract is a rural tract, and at least thirty-three percent of the
population of the tract or at least five hundred residents in the tract reside more than
ten miles from the nearest grocery store.
(bb) The census tract is an urban tract, and at least thirty-three percent of the
population of the tract or at least five hundred residents in the tract reside more than
one-half mile from the nearest grocery store.
(b) The department may also designate an area that does not meet the
standards set forth in this definition as a food desert if the designation is made in
accordance with criteria established by the department by rule using data that
includes but is not limited to poverty metrics and access to existing grocery stores.
(3) "Grocery store" means an existing or planned retail establishment that
is all of the following:
(a) Has or will have a primary business of selling a variety of grocery
products, including fresh produce.
(b) Derives or will derive no more than thirty percent of its revenue from
sales of tobacco and alcohol in any given year.
(c) Is or will be classified as a supermarket or other grocery retailer in the
2022 North American Industry Classification System pursuant to code 445110.
Page 2 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1810 RE-REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1222
(d) Accepts or will accept Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program
benefits and Special Supplemental Nutrition Program for Women, Infants, and
Children benefits.
(e) Provides or will provide for the retail sale of a substantial variety of
perishable foods, including fresh or frozen dairy products, fresh produce, and fresh
meats, poultry, and fish.
(4)(a) "Local governmental unit" means any parish, municipality, special
district, or unit that is designated as a unit of local government by law and exercises
limited governmental powers or powers in respect to limited governmental subjects.
(b) "Local governmental unit" also includes any school district or
community college district.
(5) "Not-for-profit corporation" means an organization or institution that is
organized and conducted on a not-for-profit basis with no personal profit inuring to
anyone as a result of the operation.
(6) "Rural tract" means a census tract that is not an urban tract.
(7) "Urban tract" means a census tract having its geographic centroid in an
urban area, as defined by the Bureau of the Census for the most recent year in which
all relevant data to identify food deserts is available.
§3303. Grocery initiative grants and financial support
A.(1) The department may establish the Grocery Initiative to expand access
to healthy foods in food deserts in this state and areas at risk of becoming food
deserts in this state by providing grants and other forms of financial assistance to
independently owned for-profit grocery stores, cooperative grocery stores, or
not-for-profit grocery stores, as well as grocery stores owned and operated by local
governmental units. The department may enter into contracts, grants, or other
agreements to administer these grants and other forms of financial assistance. The
department may, by rule, place limits on the size of the grocery stores that are
eligible for grants and other financial assistance pursuant to this Chapter, including
Page 3 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1810 RE-REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1222
but not limited to limits on the annual revenue or projected revenue of the applicant,
number of full-time employees, or square footage of the facilities.
(2) The department may prioritize grant awards and loan funding to
applicants based on poverty rates, income, geographic diversity, local ownership,
access to grocery stores in the area surrounding proposed project locations, and other
factors as determined by the department. The department may award grants or
provide loans for any of the following:
(a) Market and site feasibility studies, promotional materials, and marketing.
(b) Salaries and benefits for workers.
(c) Rent or a down payment to acquire a facility.
(d) Purchase of ownership of a grocery store as part of establishing a new
grocery store.
(e) Capital improvements, planning, renovations, land acquisition,
demolition, and durable and non-durable equipment purchases.
(f) Other costs as determined eligible by the department.
B. The department may provide grants for equipment upgrades for existing
independently owned for-profit grocery stores, cooperative grocery stores,
not-for-profit grocery stores, or farmer-owned grocery stores or markets. The
department may use no more than twenty percent of total program funding for this
purpose. Equipment upgrades may be focused on providing access to equipment that
is energy efficient.
C. Nothing in this Chapter shall prevent a grocery store from receiving
funding, grants, or other financial support from entities other than the department for
reasons outlined in Paragraph (A)(2) of this Section, equipment upgrades, or
technical assistance to help expand access to healthy food options in food deserts.
§3304. Technical assistance
A. The department may provide technical assistance to grantees awarded
grants pursuant to this Chapter, and other small, independently owned grocery stores
to ensure their long-term viability and business success. Technical assistance, online
Page 4 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1810 RE-REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1222
resources, and materials provided may include but are not limited to business
planning, marketing, financing, supply chain management, and workforce
development assistance.
B. The department may enter into grants, contracts, or other agreements to
provide assistance.
Section 2. The department may study food insecurity in urban and rural food deserts.
The study may include an exploration of the reasons for current market failures, potential
policy solutions, geographic trends, and the need for independent grocers, and it may
identify communities at risk of becoming food deserts. The study may also include a
disparity study to assess the need for aspirational goals for ownership among minority,
women, and persons with a disability. The department may enter into contracts, grants, or
other agreements to complete this study. If the department undertakes the study provided for
in this Section, it shall submit a report of its findings, conclusions, and recommendations for
legislative action to the legislature as soon as practicable after concluding the study.
Section 3.(A) The provisions of Sections 1 and 2 of this Act shall become effective
when an Act of the Louisiana Legislature containing a specific appropriation of monies for
the implementation of the provisions of this Act becomes effective.
(B) The provisions of this Section shall become effective upon signature by the
governor or, if not signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become
law without signature by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the
Constitution of Louisiana. If vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the
legislature, the provisions of this Section shall become effective on the day following such
approval.